Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Kari's Law

7-86-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “Kari's Law.”

Acts 2016, ch. 808, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 808, § 2. January 1, 2017.

7-86-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“911 service” has the same meaning as defined in § 7-86-103;

“Entity” means an owner or operator of a business, the state, or a local government;

“IP-enabled services” has the same meaning as defined in § 7-86-103; and

“Telephone system” includes a multiline telephone system and any equivalent system that utilizes IP-enabled services.

Acts 2016, ch. 808, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 808, § 2. January 1, 2017.

7-86-403. Free access to 911 telephone services — Upgrades to hardware or software systems — Liability.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b):

An entity that owns or controls a telephone system that is capable of outbound dialing or access shall configure the telephone system to allow a person initiating a 911 call on the telephone system direct access to 911 service without an additional code, digit, prefix, postfix, or trunk access code; and

An entity that owns or operates a residential or business facility utilizing a telephone system configured in accordance with subdivision (a)(1) shall configure the telephone system to provide notification to a central location on the site of the residential or business facility when a person within the facility dials 911. This subdivision (a)(2) does not require the entity to have a person available at the central location to receive the notification.

If an entity would be required to replace or upgrade any component of its telephone system, including any hardware or software necessary for the operation of the telephone system, for the purposes of compliance with subsection (a), the entity shall not be required to comply with subsection (a) until the entity utilizes a telephone system that is capable of being configured in accordance with subsection (a).

An entity shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action based solely upon the failure of the entity to configure a telephone system in accordance with subsection (a).

Acts 2016, ch. 808, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 808, § 2. January 1, 2017.

7-86-151. Systems funded by general revenues — Construction of chapter.